Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2668YH (4) 91 jda/jh H.F. 812 Section 1. LEGISLATIVE INTERIM STUDY COMMITTEE ââ IOWA 1 EDUCATION SUMMIT. 2 1. The legislative council is requested to establish an 3 interim study committee to meet during the 2025 legislative 4 interim to plan an Iowa education summit to be held in 2026. 5 The interim study committee shall do all of the following: 6 a. Determine a potential location, time, date, and agenda 7 for the Iowa education summit. 8 b. Study and determine educational leaders and presenters 9 who could speak during the Iowa education summit and provide 10 information related to best practices in education, including 11 but not limited to any of the following: 12 (1) Active learning. 13 (2) Differentiated instruction. 14 (3) Formative assessments. 15 (4) Providing constructive feedback. 16 (5) Using technology. 17 (6) Encouraging student, family, and community 18 participation. 19 c. Develop a list of prospective guest speakers and keynote 20 speakers for the Iowa education summit, which may include but 21 is not limited to any of the following: 22 (1) Academics. 23 (2) Practitioners. 24 (3) Elected officials. 25 (4) Students. 26 (5) Parents. 27 d. Study any other issues that the interim study committee 28 determines are relevant to the planning and execution of the 29 Iowa education summit. 30 2. The interim study committee may solicit the advice or 31 testimony of any organization or individual with information 32 or expertise relevant to the purpose of the interim study 33 committee. 34 3. a. The interim study committee shall include all of the 35 -1- LSB 2668YH (4) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 812 following members: 1 (1) Two state senators appointed by the majority leader of 2 the senate. 3 (2) Two state senators appointed by the minority leader of 4 the senate. 5 (3) Two state representatives appointed by the speaker of 6 the house of representatives. 7 (4) Two state representatives appointed by the minority 8 leader of the house of representatives. 9 (5) The director of the department of education, or the 10 directorâs designee. 11 (6) One superintendent who is employed by a school district 12 with a total enrollment of greater than or equal to five 13 thousand students. 14 (7) One superintendent who is employed by a school district 15 with a total enrollment of greater than or equal to one 16 thousand students but less than five thousand students. 17 (8) One superintendent who is employed by a school district 18 with a total enrollment of less than one thousand students. 19 (9) One special education teacher. 20 (10) One teacher who does not provide special education 21 programs or services. 22 (11) One teacher who provides early childhood education. 23 (12) Two teachers who are employed by accredited nonpublic 24 schools. 25 (13) Two teachers who are employed by charter schools or 26 innovation zone schools. 27 (14) Two employees of area education agencies. 28 b. The interim study committee shall elect one of its 29 members as chairperson. 30 4. On or before December 18, 2025, the interim study 31 committee shall submit a report to the general assembly and the 32 governor that includes all of the following: 33 a. A proposed agenda, time, date, and location of the Iowa 34 education summit. 35 -2- LSB 2668YH (4) 91 jda/jh 2/ 3 H.F. 812 b. Potential guest speakers and keynote speakers for the 1 Iowa education summit. 2